Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.725

Future voters—Disclosure of information.

Information that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter cannot be disclosed for a future voter until the person reaches 18 years of age, or until the person is eligible to participate in the next presidential primary, primary, or election. This information is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW. Information may be disclosed for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots.

[ 2023 c 361 s 1.]